Alabama, session 2026rs, HB435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-20-21, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§32-20-21
No certificate of title shall be issued for any of the
following:
(1) A manufactured home owned by the United States or
any agency thereof.
(2) A manufactured home owned by a manufacturer or
licensed manufactured home dealer and held for sale.
(3) A manufactured home owned by a nonresident of this
state and not located in this state.
(4) Manufactured homes designated 1999 and prior year
Page 1

(4) Manufactured homes designated 1999 and prior year
HB435 Engrossed
models, unless requested by a current owner pursuant to this
article.
(5) Modular homes.
(6) A manufactured home situated in this state and
permanently affixed to the real property on which it is placed
and for which the certificate of title or the manufacturer's
certificate of origin has been cancelled canceled pursuant to
subsection (b) of Section 32-20-20(b).
(7) Any other manufactured homes as prescribed by the
department."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 2

1, 2027.
HB435 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................12-Feb-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on State Government

Read for the second time and placed ................19-Feb-26
on the calendar:
0 amendments

Read for the third time and passed ................03-Mar-26
as amended
Yeas 69
Nays 12
Abstains 23


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 3